csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_m.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: niminongwaanziinaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: giminongwaanziimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: giminongwaanziinaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaanziidogena',minongwaanziidogenan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziidogenag
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziidogenan
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziidog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: niminongwaanziiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: giminongwaanziiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: minongwaanziimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: niminongwaaminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: giminongwaamimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: giminongwaaminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaamodogena',minongwaamowidogenan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: [minongwaamowidogenag,minongwaamodogenag]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: [minongwaamowidogenan,minongwaamodogenan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: [minongwaamowidog,minongwaamodog]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: niminongwaamiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: giminongwaamiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: minongwaamimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziigwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziinigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamogwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaamogoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [niminongwaanzii,niminongwaanziin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: giminongwaanziim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [giminongwaanzii,giminongwaanziin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaanziiwa',minongwaanziiwan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziiwag
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziiwan
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [minongwaanzii,minongwaanziin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: niminongwaanziimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: giminongwaanziimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: minongwaanziim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: niminongwaam
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: giminongwaamim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: giminongwaam
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaamoo',minongwaamoon]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamoog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: minongwaamoon
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: minongwaam
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: niminongwaamimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: giminongwaamimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: minongwaamim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: niminongwaanziinaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: giminongwaanziimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: giminongwaanziinaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaanziibanii',minongwaanziibaniin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziibaniig
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziibaniin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: niminongwaanziiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: giminongwaanziiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: minongwaanziimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: niminongwaaminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: giminongwaamimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: giminongwaaminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaamoobanii',minongwaamoobaniin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamoobaniig
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaamoobaniin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaamooban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: niminongwaamiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: giminongwaamiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: minongwaamimwaaban
